chimborazo/qu_EC.aff
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------
#
#    Chimborazo Quichua del Ecuador, hunspell format dictionary affix file
#    Copyright (C) 2009 Arno Teigseth, Henry David Lara
#
#    This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
#    it under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
#    the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
#    (at your option) any later version.
#
#    This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
#    but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#    MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
#    GNU Affero General Public License for more details.
#
#    You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
#    along with this program. See LICENSE.txt. If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
#    The author(s) can be contacted at arno at teigseth dot no
#
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# 

# FIXMES
# DIC for now contains "-s" for fariseo|s but should be fariseo|cuna
# -nij now made a verb "conjugation" for "Saying ~". Correctness?

# -ndij (caricuna|ndij) but not animal|ndij rather animalcuna|ndij
# Bete-elpi ? 
# .*l followed by lla is .*l-lla, not carcellla or something
# Emanuel-lla//
# carcel-lla//
# coldel-llahuan//
# corral-lla//
# costal-lla//
# Israel-lla//
# Saul-llataj//

# compas-huan//
# Dibón-gadman (accent+man no good)
# El-bet-elta//
# Et-baal//
# Ezión-geberman/
# Ezión-geberpi/
# I-laipish//
# Isaac-huan//

# which is correct?
#Is-tob//
#Is-tod//

# exists?
#Kir-hares//
#Kir-hareset//

# correct?
# Mefi-boset//
# Mifi-boset//

# correct?
# Quiriat-jearim//
# Quiriat-jerarimmantaca//

# 144milcunallami
# 18mil
# 200millonmi

# ahiramitas PLURAL S?
#belaitas//
#amorreos//
#arelitas//
# asbelitas//
#aroditas//
#bequeritas//
#beriaitas//
#carmitas//



# ayuda// parece ser usado como quichua, sería mejor yapana o algo?
# ajeno// ditto?
# achijchina o achijyachina? achijnayana? achijnicuj ? achij nina -> nicuj?

# INCONSISTENT
# bautizmo bautismo
# aillun?
# ajichu//
# ajos//
# ajushtana//vw
# áloe
# amaleccuna// vs amalecita// inconsistency
# amañado//a vs amañarina//vw inconsistency
# bulluna o bullana?
# arbitita arbatita?
# calabazo calabaza
# casana cazana




# BREAK 1
# BREAK -

# Allow checking of words on both sides of - : Mateo 10: 12-kama 16-tami will check 12 and kama separately
# HMM FIXME doesnt work well with Abi-agar and similar words...

SET UTF-8

# Unified Kichwa
# TRY akinuhstpmrclyoweñdbjgvzfqx

# Chimborazo Quichua character frequence
TRY aciunhsptmrljoeygdñqbvzáfíóéúükxw

NOSUGGEST !   # Bad words, don't suggest them.

FORBIDDENWORD ¤  # Bad combinations.

COMPOUNDMIN 1 # Minimum length of compound words

COMPOUNDBEGIN /      # start comp, all words (except accented ones) in kichwa...
COMPOUNDMIDDLE -     # middle comp
COMPOUNDEND >        # end comp
COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG + # allow (stem+affix)+compound
COMPOUNDFORBIDFLAG 1 # words not allowed in compounds, e.g. espíritu ok but not espírituka
                     # really redundant for the words with no / specified
ONLYINCOMPOUND x     # words allowed only in compounds, e.g. espíritu/ ok while forcing espiritu|ka = espiritu//x
COMPOUNDMORESUFFIXES # Allow 2-fold suffix PLUS compound (as in miku/chi/nki+pash)

# Don't consider dashes, apostrophes nor numbers word separators
WORDCHARS 0123456789-'

COMPOUNDRULE 1
COMPOUNDRULE n*d*/->
# n is "number"
# d is "dash"

# Frequently switched character groups
REP 10
REP ai ay
REP ki gui
REP wa hua
REP k j
REP nk ng
REP ki qui
REP tak taj
REP grichi chigri
REP kri gri
REP s cuna

# Frequently switched characters
MAP 8
MAP bv
MAP ie
MAP jk
MAP iy
MAP gk
MAP gq
MAP qk
MAP td

# VERBS
#
# are funny things.
#
# Let's try twofold suffix stripping to deal with the great flexibility of the Quichua verbs.
# There are [at least] two major branches of verbs, "common" and "pluralized"
#
# 1) The common conjugations are tagged with /v:
#   mikuna//v
#
# The tag /v gives "mood/direction/style" to the verb:
# miku|RA|na/c ; miku|CHI|na/c ; miku|CHIRA|na/c and so on. This is the first level.
# 
# The tag /c gives time+sex to the verb:
# miku|ra|NKI/+ ; miku|chi|RKANKI/+ ; miku|chira|RKANKICHIK/+ and so on. This is the second level (and hunspell's max for the moment).
#
# 2) The pluralizing inflex -na- is causing trouble because it comes BEFORE the "/v" tag suffixes, 
#      and is not compatible with all the "/c" variants.
#    The -na- means something like "do the verb amongst many"
#
# e.g. tanta|na|ku|nchik : -na- comes before ku, the "/v" variant, and nchik, the "/c" variant.
# e.g. tanta|na|ku|sha   : -na- comes before ku, the "/v" variant, and sha is incompatible with -na-
#
# So since the tags run the show linearly: "/v" -implies> "/c" -implies> "/+", 
#  all the variants under /v must be repeated under "/w". 
# Then we can repeat only the valid -na- combinations from "/c" to the new tag "/p".
#
# The tag /w gives "mood/direction/style" to the verb just like /v, but points to /p tag instead, and keeps the -na-:
# tantana|RA|na/p ; tantana|CHI|na/p ; tantana|CHIRA|na/p and so on. This is the first level.
#
# The tag /p gives time+sex to the verb, valid -na- combinations only:
# tantana|ku|NCHIK/+ ; tantana|chi|CHUN/+ ; tantana|CHIKU|nchik/+ and so on. This is the second level.
#
# -------------------------------------------
#
# The + is not a morph but a compound flag, to indicate that
#   miku|chira|RKANKICHIK/pash/chari  is an OK word, pash and chari being compounds.
#


# COMPOUNDS
#
# The order of the compounds could be checked with a grammar checker. 
# Hunspell does not allow repetition of compound words, so that helps a bit.
# (e.g.) mikuna/chari/chari is NOT ok.

# Rules syntax
# PFX/SFX flag stripchars(0 if none) affix condition-regex

# VERBS COMMON CONJUGATIONS common first level
SFX v Y 33
SFX v na na//+c na            # Stem/Infinitive common
SFX v na nij//+ na            # "Saying ~"
SFX v na rina//+c na          # reflexive
SFX v na rimuna//+c na        # reflexive "arriving ~ing"
SFX v na rihuana//+c na        # reflexive ~ in my favor
SFX v na richina//+c na       # reflexive "make ~"
SFX v na rigrina//+c na       # reflexive "going to ~"
SFX v na ricuna//+c na        # reflexive "constantly ~"
SFX v na grina//+c na         # "going to ~"
SFX v na rana//+c na          # "always ~"
SFX v na racuna//+c na          # "always ~"
SFX v na riyana//+c na        # "always ~"
SFX v na cuna//+c na          # "constantly ~"
SFX v na cumuna//+c na        # "constantly arriving doing ~"
SFX v na cumurina//+c na      # "constantly arriving doing ~ reflexive"
SFX v na cuchina//+c na       # "constantly make ~"
SFX v na cugrina//+c na       # "constantly going to ~"
SFX v na gricuna//+c na       # "constantly going to ~"
SFX v na muna//+c na          # "arriving ~ing"
SFX v na muhuana//+c na        # "arriving ~ing in my favor"
SFX v na mugrina//+c na       # "going to arrive ~ing" 
SFX v na mugrichina//+c na       # "going to arrive making ~" 
SFX v na muchina//+c na       # "arriving making ~" 
SFX v na mucuna//+c na        # "constantly arriving ~ing"
SFX v na huana//+c na          # "doing ~ in my favor"
SFX v na china//+c na         # "make ~"
SFX v na chihuana//+c na       # "make ~ in my favor"
SFX v na chirina//+c na       # "make ~ for oneself"
SFX v na chicuna//+c na          # "constantly making ~"
SFX v na chigrina//+c na      # "going to make ~"
SFX v na grichina//+c na      # "going to make someone ~"
SFX v na chimuna//+c na       # "arriving making ~"
SFX v na chimucuna//+c na       # "arriving making ~"
