chimborazo/qu_EC.dic
achcayana//vw
achijnayana//vw
achijyachina//vw
achina//vw
acusana//vw
dibina//vw
granona//vw
advertina//vw
agllana//vw
agradicina//vw
ahogana//vw
ahuantana//vw
aisachina//vw
ajushtana//vw
allana//vw
allaucayana//vw
allichina//vw
allinayana//vw
allishunguyana//vw
alliyana//vw
alquilana//vw
amañarina//vw
amcasyana//vw
amintanayana//vw
amsana//vw
amsayana//vw
amucyana//vw
anchayana//vw
anchuna//vw
ancuyana//vw
angasyana//vw
animachina//vw
apanacuna//vw
apiana//vw
apoyana//vw
armana//vw
arrendana//vw
ashallayana//vw
ashayana//vw
ashnajyana//vw
ashtana//vw
asirina//vw
aspina//vw
auana//vw
aullina//vw
ayudana//vw
ayunpacuna//vw
azulyana//vw
batina//vw
bendiciana//vw
bordana//vw
brujiyana//vw
bullanacuna//vw
cachana//vw
cachiyachina//vw
c'acuna//vw
c'ahuirina//vw
calimana//vw
callpana//vw
camana//vw
cambiana//vw
camchana//vw
camina//vw
canchana//vw
canchisyana//vw
canina//vw
cantana//vw
capana//vw
caparinacuna//vw
caparirina//vw
carachayana//vw
carcanayana//vw
carcelana//vw
cargana//vw
cariana//vw
c'ariyana//vw
casarachina//vw
cashtuna//vw
casinayana//vw
caspiana//vw
caspiyana//vw
casuna//vw
catina//vw
catuna//vw
cauina//vw
causana//vw
cayachina//vw
cazarana//vw
chacrana//vw
chagruna//vw
chainina//vw
chajmana//vw
chajruna//vw
ch'alana//vw
challchunayana//vw
challiana//vw
chamujnayana//vw
chanina//vw
chapuna//vw
charijnayana//vw
charina//vw
charquiana//vw
charquinayana//vw
chaspina//vw
chauana//vw
chauanyana//vw
chauchanayana//vw
chaupinacuna//vw
chaupinayana//vw
chaupiyana//vw
chayana//vw
ch'icanchina//vw
chichuna//vw
chichuyana//vw
chijtana//vw
chillpina//vw
ch'imbana//vw
ch'imbapurachina//vw
chingachina//vw
chingayana//vw
chirapana//vw
chirinayana//vw
chucana//vw
chujchuna//vw
chullunayana//vw
chumbillina//vw
chungayana//vw
chununayana//vw
churuna//vw
chushajnayana//vw
chutana//vw
chuyayana//vw
colerachina//vw
contestana//vw
cozichana//vw
cucayana//vw
cuchuyana//vw
culunyana//vw
cuna//vw
cungana//vw
cunujyana//vw
curcuyana//vw
cusca//vw
cushicuna//vw
cushnina//vw
cutichina//vw
cutsiana//vw
cutuyana//vw
cuyuchina//vw
debina//vw
desanimana//vw
discretonayana//vw
doñoyana//vw
entendina//vw
escribina//vw
jaitana//vw
fichuyana//vw
fiyana//vw
garhuana//vw
gratisnayana//vw
hilluyana//vw
huacaysiquiana//vw
huacuyana//vw
huainayana//vw
huajiana//vw
huajtana//vw
huaminsiana//vw
huancarina//vw
huañuchina//vw
huashanyana//vw
huashicuna//vw
huatujuna//vw
huayllanayana//vw
huaytana//vw
huichiana//vw
huijsayuna//vw
huiñana//vw
huishina//vw
humildeyana//vw
illana//vw
iñina//vw
inventana//vw
iquinayana//vw
iscunyana//vw
ishpana//vw
jacanyana//vw
jahuayana//vw
jamujyana//vw
japichina//vw
jasmana//vw
jatunyana//vw
jaytana//vw
juchachina//vw
jujipuna//vw
jumpina//vw
jutcuna//vw
lisiana//vw
llajllana//vw
llancana//vw
llatana//vw
llimpiana//vw
llimpiyajyana//vw
llucana//vw
lluchuna//vw
llujiana//vw
llullajnayana//vw
llulluyana//vw
llupina//vw
lunyana//vw
machana//vw
manchana//vw
mapayana//vw
mayanayana//vw
mayllana//vw
mayoryana//vw
migllana//vw
millpuna//vw
mirana//vw
mishquichina//vw
mitsajyana//vw
muchana//vw
munana//vw
muscuna//vw
muspanayana//vw
mutquina//vw
ñajchana//vw
ñañuyana//vw
nina//vw
ñutunayana//vw
obligana//vw
pacunayana//vw
pajtanayana//vw
pangallanayana//vw
pantanayana//vw
parejana//vw
pasayana//vw
patarina//vw
pichana//vw
piñanacuna//vw
pincana//vw
pishcanayana//vw
preocupana//vw
pucanayana//vw
pujayana//vw
pulasnayana//vw
puñuna//vw
purunyana//vw
pusunayana//vw
puzujnayana//vw
quichcinayana//vw
quillachina//vw
quillpana//vw
quimirina//vw
quincuna//vw
quiquinyana//vw
quitayana//vw
raumana//vw
respetana//vw
richana//vw
rijchana//vw
rimana//vw
rujunayana//vw
rurana//vw
sajrayana//vw
sancuyana//vw
sapallanayana//vw
saruna//vw
sauarina//vw
sellana//vw
shamuna//vw
shayarina//vw
shina//vw
shujtajnayana//vw
shutiana//vw
shuyana//vw
sicana//vw
sintina//vw
sirvina//vw
suchuna//vw
sujtanayana//vw
surcuna//vw
tajshana//vw
tancana//vw
tantana//vw
tapuna//vw
tiana//vw
tijllayana//vw
tinquina//vw
trancana//vw
tsalayana//vw
tsantsanayana//vw
tsignina//vw
tsuntsunayana//vw
tujtsana//vw
tullpuna//vw
tupuna//vw
ujiana//vw
ujunayana//vw
unayana//vw
upana//vw
upyana//vw
urinayana//vw
utcana//vw
valina//vw
yachachina//vw
yalliana//vw
yanapana//vw
yantana//vw
yaricana//vw
yurajnayana//vw
yuyana//vw
